dev/mt_brokenplurals/appendix1.fat.dix
  <!-- kappun; k; 3 -->
    <pardef n="k/appun__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>appun</l>
          <r>appun<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>papan</l>
          <r>appun<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>papen</l>
          <r>appun<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- stanga; stan; 2 -->
    <pardef n="stan/ga__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ga</l>
          <r>ga<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eg</l>
          <r>ga<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  </pardefs>

    <e lm="kappun"><i>k</i><par n="k/appun__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="stanga"><i>stan</i><par n="stan/ga__n_GD"/></e>
